test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-jalkw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - jalkõ : # Noun 'leg, foot/jalka/jalg/ног' - full paradigm
# Heinsoo, Heinike 2015: Vadʼdʼa sõnakopittõja. Tartu-Helsinki. (88-89).
     jalkõ+N+Sg+Nom: jalkõ
     jalkõ+N+Sg+Gen: jalga
# Check the form
     jalkõ+N+Sg+Par: jalka
     jalkõ+N+Sg+Ill: [jalka, jalkasõ]
     jalkõ+N+Sg+Ine: jalgõz
     jalkõ+N+Sg+Ela: jalgõssõ
     jalkõ+N+Sg+All: jalgõllõ
     jalkõ+N+Sg+Ade: jalgõllõ
     jalkõ+N+Sg+Abl: jalgõltõ
     jalkõ+N+Sg+Tra: jalgõssi
     jalkõ+N+Sg+Ter: jalkaassaa
     jalkõ+N+Sg+Com: jalgaka
     jalkõ+N+Pl+Nom: jalgõd
     jalkõ+N+Pl+Gen: [jalkoi, jalkojõ]
     jalkõ+N+Pl+Par: [jalkoi, jalkoitõ]
     jalkõ+N+Pl+Ill: jalkoisõ
     jalkõ+N+Pl+Ine: jalkoiz
     jalkõ+N+Pl+Ela: jalkoissõ
     jalkõ+N+Pl+All: jalkoillõ
     jalkõ+N+Pl+Ade: jalkoillõ
     jalkõ+N+Pl+Abl: jalkoiltõ
     jalkõ+N+Pl+Tra: jalkoissi
     jalkõ+N+Pl+Ter: jalkoissaa
     jalkõ+N+Pl+Com: jalkoika
